Rhode Island statutes. Title 14 Delinquent and Dependent Children
Chapter 1 Proceedings in Family Court

14-1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be designated as the “Family Court Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-7

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14.

14-1-2.
Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is:

To secure for each child under its jurisdiction the care, guidance, and control, preferably in his or her own home, that will serve the child’s welfare and the best interests of the state;

To conserve and strengthen the child’s family ties wherever possible, removing him or her from the custody of his or her parents only when his or her welfare or the safety and protection of the public cannot be adequately safeguarded without that removal; and

When a child is removed from his or her own family, to secure for him or her custody, care, and discipline as nearly as possible equivalent to that which should have been given by his or her parents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-2

.

14-1-3.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall, unless the context otherwise requires, be construed as follows:

“Adult” means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older.

“Appropriate person,” as used in §§

14-1-10

and

14-1-11

, except in matters relating to adoptions and child marriages, means and includes:

Any police official of this state, or of any city or town within this state;

Any duly qualified prosecuting officer of this state, or of any city or town within this state;

Any director of public welfare of any city or town within this state, or his or her duly authorized subordinate;

Any truant officer or other school official of any city or town within this state;

Any duly authorized representative of any public or duly licensed private agency or institution established for purposes similar to those specified in §

8-10-2

or

14-1-2

; or

Any maternal or paternal grandparent, who alleges that the surviving parent, in those cases in which one parent is deceased, is an unfit and improper person to have custody of any child or children.

“Child” means a person under eighteen (18) years of age.

“The court” means the family court of the state of Rhode Island.

“Delinquent,” when applied to a child, means and includes any child who has committed any offense that, if committed by an adult, would constitute a felony, or who has on more than one occasion violated any of the other laws of the state or of the United States or any of the ordinances of cities and towns, other than ordinances relating to the operation of motor vehicles.

“Dependent” means any child who requires the protection and assistance of the court when his or her physical or mental health or welfare is harmed, or threatened with harm, due to the inability of the parent or guardian, through no fault of the parent or guardian, to provide the child with a minimum degree of care or proper supervision because of:

The death or illness of a parent; or

The special medical, educational, or social-service needs of the child which the parent is unable to provide.

“Justice” means a justice of the family court.

“Neglect” means a child who requires the protection and assistance of the court when his or her physical or mental health or welfare is harmed, or threatened with harm, when the parents or guardian:

Fails to supply the child with adequate food, clothing, shelter, or medical care, though financially able to do so or offered financial or other reasonable means to do so;

Fails to provide the child proper education as required by law; or

Abandons and/or deserts the child.

“Supervised independent living setting” means a supervised setting in which a young adult is living independently, that meets any safety and/or licensing requirements established by the department for this population, and is paired with a supervising agency or a supervising worker, including, but not limited to, single or shared apartments or houses, host homes, relatives’ and mentors’ homes, college dormitories or other postsecondary educational or vocational housing. All or part of the financial assistance that secures an independent supervised setting for a young adult may be paid directly to the young adult if there is no provider or other child-placing intermediary, or to a landlord, a college, or to a supervising agency, or to other third parties on behalf of the young adult in the discretion of the department.

“Voluntary placement agreement for extension of care” means a written agreement between the state agency and a young adult who meets the eligibility conditions specified in §

14-1-6(c)

, acting as their own legal guardian that is binding on the parties to the agreement. At a minimum, the agreement recognizes the voluntary nature of the agreement, the legal status of the young adult and the rights and obligations of the young adult, as well as the services and supports the agency agrees to provide during the time that the young adult consents to giving the department legal responsibility for care and placement.

“Wayward,” when applied to a child, means and includes any child:

Who has deserted his or her home without good or sufficient cause;

Who habitually associates with dissolute, vicious, or immoral persons;

Who is leading an immoral or vicious life;

Who is habitually disobedient to the reasonable and lawful commands of his or her parent or parents, guardian, or other lawful custodian;

Who, being required by chapter 19 of title 16 to attend school, willfully and habitually absents himself or herself from school or habitually violates the rules and regulations of the school when he or she attends;

Who has, on any occasion, violated any of the laws of the state or of the United States or any of the ordinances of cities and towns, other than ordinances relating to the operation of motor vehicles; or

Any child under seventeen (17) years of age who violates §

21-28.11-22

, and who is not exempted from the penalties pursuant to chapter 28.6 of title 21.

“Young adult” means an individual who has attained the age of eighteen (18) years but has not reached the age of twenty-one (21) years and was in the legal custody of the department on their eighteenth birthday pursuant to an abuse, neglect or dependency petition; or was a former foster child who was adopted or placed in a guardianship after attaining age sixteen (16).

The singular shall be construed to include the plural, the plural the singular, and the masculine the feminine, when consistent with the intent of this chapter.

For the purposes of this chapter, “electronic surveillance and monitoring devices” means any “radio frequency identification device (RFID)” or “global positioning device” that is either tethered to a person or is intended to be kept with a person and is used for the purposes of tracking the whereabouts of that person within the community.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-3

; P.L. 1969, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 291, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 9; P.L. 1994, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 133, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 17, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 11, effective May 25, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 11, effective May 25, 2022.

14-1-4.
Idleness or frequenting of disreputable places.

Every child who has completed sixteen (16) years of life and has not completed eighteen (18) years of life and who habitually spends his or her time in idleness without just and sufficient reason or cause, or in frequenting poolrooms, places where intoxicating liquors are sold, gambling places, or houses of ill repute, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor; and upon conviction shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 76, § 9; P.L. 1926, ch. 840, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 181, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-4

.

14-1-5.
Exclusive jurisdiction.

The court shall, as set forth in this chapter, have exclusive original jurisdiction in proceedings:

Concerning any child residing or being within the state who is: (i) Delinquent; (ii) Wayward; (iii) Dependent; (iv) Neglected; or (v) Mentally disabled;

Concerning adoption of children;

To determine the paternity of any child alleged to have been born out of wedlock and to provide for the support and disposition of that child in case that child or the child’s mother has residence within the state; and

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 39, § 3 and P.L. 2021, ch. 40, § 3.]

Referred to the court in accordance with the provisions of §

14-1-28

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-5

; P.L. 1994, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 260, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 18; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 18; P.L. 2018, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 39, § 3, effective June 7, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 40, § 3, effective June 7, 2021.

14-1-5.1.
Age in dispute.

In any proceeding under this chapter where the age of a person is in dispute, the person whose age is in dispute shall prove his or her age to the reasonable satisfaction of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 246, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 411, § 1.

14-1-6.
Retention of jurisdiction.

When the court shall have obtained jurisdiction over any child prior to the child having attained the age of eighteen (18) years by the filing of a petition alleging that the child is wayward or delinquent pursuant to §

14-1-5

, the child shall, except as specifically provided in this chapter, continue under the jurisdiction of the court until he or she becomes nineteen (19) years of age, unless discharged prior to turning nineteen (19).

When the court shall have obtained jurisdiction over any child prior to the child’s eighteenth (18th) birthday by the filing of a miscellaneous petition or a petition alleging that the child is dependent, neglected, or abused pursuant to §§

14-1-5

and

40-11-7

or

42-72-14

, the child shall, except as specifically provided in this chapter, continue under the jurisdiction of the court until he or she becomes eighteen (18) years of age; provided, that at least six (6) months prior to a child turning eighteen (18) years of age, the court shall require the department of children, youth and families to provide a description of the transition services including the child’s housing, health insurance, education and/or employment plan; available mentors and continuing support services, including workforce supports and employment services afforded the child in placement; or a detailed explanation as to the reason those services were not offered. As part of the transition planning, the child shall be informed by the department of the opportunity to voluntarily agree to extended care and placement by the department and legal supervision by the court until age twenty-one (21). The details of a child’s transition plan shall be developed in consultation with the child, wherever possible, and approved by the court prior to the dismissal of an abuse, neglect, dependency, or miscellaneous petition before the child’s twenty-first birthday.

A child, who is in foster care on their eighteenth birthday due to the filing of a miscellaneous petition or a petition alleging that the child is dependent, neglected, or abused pursuant to §

14-1-5

, §

40-11-7

, or §

42-72-14

, may voluntarily elect to continue responsibility for care and placement from DCYF and to remain under the legal supervision of the court as a young adult until age twenty-one (21), provided:

The young adult was in the legal custody of the department at age eighteen (18); and

The young adult is participating in at least one of the following:

Completing the requirements to receive a high school diploma or GED;

Completing a secondary education or a program leading to an equivalent credential; enrolled in an institution that provides postsecondary or vocational education;

Participating in a job-training program or an activity designed to promote or remove barriers to employment;

Is employed for at least eighty (80) hours per month; or

Is incapable of doing any of the foregoing due to a medical condition that is regularly updated and documented in the case plan.

A former foster child who was adopted or placed in guardianship with an adoption assistance agreement or a guardianship assistance agreement that was executed on or after his or her sixteenth birthday and prior to his or her eighteenth birthday may voluntarily agree to extended care and placement by the department and legal supervision by the court until age twenty-one (21) if the young adult satisfies the requirements in subsection (c)(2). Provided, however, the department retains the right to review the request and first attempt to address the issues through the adoption assistance agreement by providing post adoptive or post guardianship support services to the young adult and his or her adoptive or guardianship family.

Upon the request of the young adult, who voluntarily agreed to the extension of care and placement by the department and legal supervision by the court, pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the court’s legal supervision and the department’s responsibility for care and placement may be terminated. Provided, however, the young adult may request reinstatement of responsibility and resumption of the court’s legal supervision at any time prior to his or her twenty-first birthday if the young adult meets the requirements set forth in subsection (c)(2). If the department wishes to terminate the court’s legal supervision and its responsibility for care and placement, it may file a motion for good cause. The court may exercise its discretion to terminate legal supervision over the young adult at any time.

With the consent of the person previously under the court’s supervision, the court may reopen, extend, or retain its jurisdiction beyond that person’s twenty-first birthday until his or her twenty-second birthday or until September 30, 2021, whichever date occurs first, under the following circumstances:

The person aged out of DCYF care or left foster care during the COVID-19 public health emergency, defined as beginning on January 27, 2020, and is entitled to extended benefits pursuant to the terms of the Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021, Pub. L. No. 116-260; and

The court has or had obtained jurisdiction over the person prior to his or her eighteenth birthday by the filing of a miscellaneous petition or a petition alleging that the child is dependent, abused, or neglected pursuant to §

14-1-5

, §

40-11-7

, or §

42-72-14

or after the person’s eighteenth birthday pursuant to a voluntary extension of care petition; and

Court supervision is necessary for the department of children, youth and families to access IV-E funding to support such benefits, in whole or in part; and

Court supervision is required to continue transition planning and to ensure the safety, permanency, and well-being of older youth who remain in or who age out of foster care and re-enter foster care.

The court may retain jurisdiction of any child who is seriously emotionally disturbed or developmentally delayed pursuant to §

42-72-5(b)(24)(v)

until that child turns age twenty-one (21) when the court shall have obtained jurisdiction over any child prior to the child’s eighteenth birthday by the filing of a miscellaneous petition or a petition alleging that the child is dependent, neglected, and/or abused pursuant to §§

14-1-5

, and

40-11-7

, or

42-72-14

.

The department of children, youth and families shall work collaboratively with the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and other agencies, in accordance with §

14-1-59

, to provide the family court with a transition plan for those individuals who come under the court’s jurisdiction pursuant to a petition alleging that the child is dependent, neglected, and/or abused and who are seriously emotionally disturbed or developmentally delayed pursuant to §

42-72-5(b)(24)(v)

. This plan shall be a joint plan presented to the court by the department of children, youth and families and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. The plan shall include the behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals’ community or residential service level, health insurance option, education plan, available mentors, continuing support services, workforce supports and employment services, and the plan shall be provided to the court at least twelve (12) months prior to discharge. At least three (3) months prior to discharge, the plan shall identify the specific placement for the child, if a residential placement is needed. The court shall monitor the transition plan. In the instance where the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals has not made timely referrals to appropriate placements and services, the department of children, youth and families may initiate referrals.

The parent and/or guardian and/or guardian ad litem of a child who is seriously emotionally disturbed or developmentally delayed pursuant to §

42-72-5(b)(24)(v)

, and who is before the court pursuant to §§ 14-1-5(1)(iii) through 14-1-5(1)(v), §

40-11-7

, or §

42-72-14

, shall be entitled to a transition hearing, as needed, when the child reaches the age of twenty (20) if no appropriate transition plan has been submitted to the court by the department of children, youth and families and the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals. The family court shall require that the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall immediately identify a liaison to work with the department of children, youth and families until the child reaches the age of twenty-one (21) and an immediate transition plan be submitted if the following facts are found:

No suitable transition plan has been presented to the court addressing the levels of service appropriate to meet the needs of the child as identified by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals; or

No suitable housing options, health insurance, educational plan, available mentors, continuing support services, workforce supports, and employment services have been identified for the child.

In any case where the court shall not have acquired jurisdiction over any person prior to the person’s eighteenth (18th) birthday by the filing of a petition alleging that the person had committed an offense, but a petition alleging that the person had committed an offense that would be punishable as a felony if committed by an adult has been filed before that person attains the age of nineteen (19) years of age, that person shall, except as specifically provided in this chapter, be subject to the jurisdiction of the court until he or she becomes nineteen (19) years of age, unless discharged prior to turning nineteen (19).

In any case where the court shall not have acquired jurisdiction over any person prior to the person attaining the age of nineteen (19) years by the filing of a petition alleging that the person had committed an offense prior to the person attaining the age of eighteen (18) years that would be punishable as a felony if committed by an adult, that person shall be referred to the court that had jurisdiction over the offense if it had been committed by an adult. The court shall have jurisdiction to try that person for the offense committed prior to the person attaining the age of eighteen (18) years and, upon conviction, may impose a sentence not exceeding the maximum penalty provided for the conviction of that offense.

In any case where the court has certified and adjudicated a child in accordance with the provisions of §§

14-1-7.2

and

14-1-7.3

, the jurisdiction of the court shall encompass the power and authority to sentence the child to a period in excess of the age of nineteen (19) years. However, in no case shall the sentence be in excess of the maximum penalty provided by statute for the conviction of the offense.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the jurisdiction of other courts over offenses committed by any person after he or she reaches the age of eighteen (18) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 15, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 18, § 2; P.L. 1991, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 532, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 9, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 3; P.L. 2015, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 130, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 47, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 70, § 3; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 5, effective July 6, 2021; P.L. 2022, ch. 234, art. 2, § 7, effective June 28, 2022.

14-1-6.1.
Records.

In any case where a court shall have obtained jurisdiction of a juvenile having attained the age of seventeen (17) years pursuant to 2007 P.L. 73, Article 22, section 1:

All police records relating to the arrest, detention, apprehension and disposition of the juvenile and all records of identification maintained pursuant to chapter 12-1 of the general laws shall be treated as family court records in accordance with §§

14-1-64

and

38-2-2

of the general laws; provided, however, that no person and no department, agency or any other instrumentality of the state or of any subdivision thereof shall be held liable or otherwise legally accountable for having disclosed or disseminated any such records in reasonable reliance upon the law in effect between July 1, 2007, and the effective date of this act [November 8, 2007]; and provided further that nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit the use of witness statements and other police records in the course of judicial proceedings initiated prior to the effective date of this act; and

All court records of such proceedings shall be sealed upon final disposition of the case in the event of a no information, dismissal or not guilty finding or upon the completion of any sentence, probation and/or parole imposed therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 532, § 2.

14-1-6.2.
Sentencing.

In any case in which the court shall have jurisdiction of a juvenile pursuant to this chapter, the court shall consider placing the juvenile in the least restrictive appropriate facility or program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 532, § 2.

14-1-7.
Waiver of jurisdiction or certification hearing.

If any child is charged with an offense which would be punishable by life imprisonment if committed by an adult, that child, upon motion of the attorney general, shall be brought before the court and the court shall conduct a waiver hearing pursuant to §

14-1-7.1

.

Any child sixteen (16) years of age or older who is charged with an offense which would constitute a felony if committed by an adult shall, upon motion of the attorney general, be brought before the court and the court shall conduct a waiver hearing pursuant to §

14-1-7.1

.

Any child who is charged with an offense which would constitute a felony if committed by an adult shall, upon motion of the attorney general, be brought before the court and the court shall conduct a certification hearing pursuant to §

14-1-7.2

.

Any motion for waiver or certification shall be filed with the court within thirty (30) days of arraignment.

In any hearing on a motion for waiver pursuant to §

14-1-7.1

, the court may consider whether or not the child may be alternatively certified pursuant to §

14-1-7.2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 15, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 18, § 2.

14-1-7.1.
Waiver of jurisdiction — Proof.

Upon a motion by the attorney general pursuant to §

14-1-7

, the court shall conduct a hearing at which it shall be the duty of the attorney general to produce evidence to enable the court to determine:

That probable cause exists to believe that the offense charged has been committed and that the child charged has committed it, unless the proof has been elicited at a prior hearing on detention of the juvenile and the findings have been made by the same justice of the family court who is conducting the waiver proceeding; and

That the child’s past history of offenses, history of treatment, or the heinous or premeditated nature of the offense is such that the court finds that the interests of society or the protection of the public necessitate the waiver of jurisdiction of the court over the child.

If the court finds that subdivisions (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section have been proven by a preponderance of evidence, it may waive jurisdiction over the child and refer the child to the appropriate adult court to be tried for the offense as an adult.

A waiver of jurisdiction over a child pursuant to this section shall constitute a waiver of jurisdiction over that child for the offense upon which the motion is based as well as for all pending and subsequent offenses of whatever nature, and the child shall be referred to the court which would have had jurisdiction if the offense had been committed by an adult. In the event that the child is acquitted of the offense for which the waiver has been sought, the waiver shall be vacated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 15, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 18, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 132, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 261, § 1.

14-1-7.2.
Certification — Proof.

Upon a motion by the attorney general pursuant to §

14-1-7

, the court shall conduct a hearing at which it shall be the duty of the attorney general to produce evidence to enable the court to determine:

Probable cause exists to believe that the offense charged has been committed and that the child charged has committed it;

The child’s past history of offenses, history of treatment, or the heinous or premeditated nature of the offense is such that the court finds that the interests of society or the protection of the public necessitate the certification; and

The jurisdiction of the court but for the exercise of certification is in all likelihood an insufficient period of time in which to accomplish a rehabilitation of the child.

If the court finds that subdivisions (a)(1) — (a)(3) of this section have been proven by a preponderance of evidence, it shall certify the child pursuant to §

14-1-7.3

.

Any person sixteen (16) years of age or older who has been found delinquent for having committed two (2) offenses after the age of sixteen (16), which would render that person subject to an indictment if he or she were an adult, shall be certified pursuant to this section. Any findings for offenses which have occurred prior to April 11, 1990, shall be considered in making a determination of eligibility for certification. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a waiver of jurisdiction of any child pursuant to §

14-1-7.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 15, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 18, § 2.

14-1-7.3.
Certification — Effect.

Upon a finding by the court that the child is subject to certification pursuant to §

14-1-7.2

, the court shall afford the child a right to a jury trial, and upon conviction for the offense charged, the court shall sentence the child in accordance with one of the following alternatives:

Impose a sentence upon the child to the training school for youth until the time that the child attains the age of nineteen (19) years;

Impose a sentence upon the child for a period in excess of the child’s nineteenth birthday to the adult correctional institutions, with the period of the child’s minority to be served in the training school for youth in a facility to be designated by the court. However, the sentence shall not exceed the maximum sentence provided for by statute for conviction of the offense.

Any child who is certified shall not be eligible for release from the training school for youth unless, after hearing, the certifying judge, or the chief judge in his or her absence, or his or her designee, determines by clear and convincing evidence that the child will not pose a threat to the public during the term of the release.

In the event that the court has modified the order of certification pursuant to §

14-1-42

by suspending the balance of the sentence imposed, any violation of the terms of the suspended sentence shall be referred to the appropriate adult court to be treated in accordance with the regular procedure of the court, unless the person is under the age of eighteen (18) years at the time of the violation, in which case, jurisdiction over the sentence shall continue in the family court.

In the event that the court, after a hearing on modification of the order of certification pursuant to §

14-1-42

, has determined that it has not been demonstrated by clear and convincing evidence that the person has been sufficiently rehabilitated and could be released in the community without posing a danger to the public should the order of certification be modified, the court shall deny the modification of the order of certification and direct the person to serve the balance of his or her sentence under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections in a facility under the control of the department. The sentence, including any term served in the training school for youth, shall be subject to the regulations and statutes governing the parole board.

Any person who commits an offense which would be punishable as a felony if committed by an adult, after having been certified and adjudicated by the family court pursuant to §

14-1-7.2

, may, after a hearing by a justice of the family court to determine that probable cause exists to believe that the child has committed the offense, have the jurisdiction over his or her sentence transferred to the department of corrections to be served in facilities under the control of the department.

A finding that the child is subject to certification shall constitute presumptive evidence of the non-amenability of the person to further treatment in facilities available to the family court and the court shall transfer the jurisdiction over his or her sentence to the department of corrections to be served in facilities under the control of the department, unless the presumption is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence which demonstrates that the person is amenable to treatment in family court facilities.

A finding that the child is subject to certification shall also constitute presumptive evidence of the non-amenability of the person to further treatment in facilities available to the family court and the court shall waive jurisdiction over that offense and all subsequent offenses and the child shall be prosecuted for the offense by the court which would have jurisdiction if committed by an adult, unless the presumption is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence which demonstrates that the person is amenable to treatment in family court facilities.

A waiver of jurisdiction over a child pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall constitute a waiver of jurisdiction over that child for that offense and for all subsequent offenses of whatever nature, and the child shall be referred to the court which would have had jurisdiction if the offense had been committed by an adult.

The name of any person waived or certified and convicted shall be available to the general public.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 15, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 18, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 22, § 1.

14-1-7.4.
Waiver or certification of juvenile drug offenders.

A child sixteen (16) years of age or older who has been found delinquent of having committed one felony offense after the age of sixteen (16) involving the unlawful sale, distribution, manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, distribute, or deliver any controlled substance listed in Schedule I or II of §

21-28-2.08

, shall be either certified pursuant to §

14-1-7.2

or waived pursuant to §

14-1-7.1

for all subsequent felony offenses involving the unlawful sale, distribution, manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture, sell, distribute, or deliver any controlled substance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 275, § 3.

14-1-8.
Jurisdiction over adults.

The court shall, as set forth in this chapter, have exclusive original jurisdiction to determine all cases of adults involved in matters arising out of §

14-1-5(3)

and all cases of adults charged with:

Being responsible for or contributing to the delinquency, waywardness, or neglect of any child under sixteen (16) years of age;

Desertion, abandonment, or failure to provide subsistence for any child dependent upon him or her for support; or

Neglect to send any child to school as required by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-8

.

14-1-9.
Waiver of jurisdiction over adult.

If an adult is charged with an offense over which the family court may have jurisdiction by virtue of §

14-1-8

,

11-9-9

, or

8-10-4

, the court may waive jurisdiction over the adult and order that adult held for trial under the regular procedure of the court which would otherwise have jurisdiction of that offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-9

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 1987, ch. 568, § 1.

14-1-10.
Preliminary investigation on information furnished to court.

Except in case of emergency detention, whenever any appropriate person shall give to the court information in his or her possession that a child is within the provisions of this chapter, it shall be the duty of the court to make a preliminary investigation to determine whether the interests of the public or of the child require that further action be taken, and to report its findings together with a statement of the facts to the judge. The inquiry may include a preliminary investigation of the home and environmental situation of the child, his or her previous history, and the circumstances which were the subject of the information. To avoid duplication of effort and to take full advantage of all existing facilities, the report of any public agency, or of any private social agency licensed by the department of children, youth, and families, may be accepted by the court as sufficient evidence for the filing of a petition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-10

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1985, ch. 98, § 1.

14-1-11.
Authorizing and filing petition.

The filing of the petition constitutes assumption of jurisdiction over the child. Filing shall take place upon authorization by the intake department upon completion of its procedures pursuant to Rule 3 of the Rules of Juvenile Proceedings, upon authorization by a justice of the family court pursuant to Rule 4 of the Rules of Juvenile Proceedings, or immediately upon appearance of the child before the court following emergency detention, unless the court otherwise orders.

In the event that a petition is filed, any appropriate person having knowledge, information, or belief of the material facts that appear to warrant a petition may be a petitioner under this chapter and is not required to give recognizance or surety for costs. The petition shall be directed to the family court of the state of Rhode Island, setting forth, that in the opinion of the petitioner the child is a delinquent, wayward, dependent, or neglected child, or otherwise comes within the provisions of this chapter, and requires the care and protection of the state, and all petitions, with the exception of those requesting the arrest and/or detention of any person, shall be sworn to before a licensed notary public. Those exceptions, as stated above, shall be sworn to by either a justice or clerk of the family court.

No child shall be ordered detained at the training school unless there is pending against the child a petition setting forth facts that would constitute a felony or misdemeanor if committed by an adult or that alleges a violation of a valid court order, or unless the child is adjudged in contempt of court. Provided, the family court shall not detain a juvenile at the training school for the violation of a valid court order, until a hearing is conducted and it is determined that the child intentionally violated the order, and the violation involves the failure of the child to engage in services or activities intended to protect or promote the child’s health or safety, or the health or safety of any other person or persons.

In the event a child is ordered to be detained at the training school, the family court shall conduct a probable cause hearing within five (5) calendar days of the child’s detention (exclusive of weekends and/or holidays). At the conclusion of the probable cause hearing, the court shall order the release of the child from the training school unless the court finds that the child poses a substantial risk of harm to self or to others.

Nothing in this section prohibits the temporary commitment by the family court to the department of children, youth and families for placement of a child in a specific facility or program other than the training school for youth.

The department of children, youth and families, in consultation with law enforcement agencies, the attorney general, the office of the public defender, and the family court, shall develop and implement a detention risk assessment instrument by no later than July 1, 2009.

No child shall be placed in detention at the training school unless a determination is made by the family court that the child poses a substantial risk of harm to self or to others.

No petition alleging that a child is wayward by virtue of disobedient behavior may be filed except upon proof offered in the petition that the child has been subjected to a needs assessment conducted at a facility approved by the director of the department of children, youth and families and that a treatment plan resulting from that assessment has been unsuccessful.

The director of the department of children, youth and families is authorized and directed to promulgate any rules and regulations that it deems necessary to implement the provisions and purposes of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

14-1-11

; impl. am. P.L. 1961, ch. 73, § 14; P.L. 1977, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 23, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 9; P.L. 2015, ch. 190, § 1.